Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-328
County; cede jurisdiction;
limitation.

A county which encompasses a city of
the metropolitan class or city of the primary class shall not cede or transfer
extraterritorial jurisdiction over land to a city of the first or second class or village if, on the date the county receives
a request pursuant to subsection (1) of section 13-327, such land lies within
the area extending three miles from the extraterritorial jurisdiction boundaries
of such city of the metropolitan class or city of the primary class.

Laws 2002, LB 729, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1126, § 2.